test/src/morphology/N-mielkk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieˊǩǩ â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: mieˊlǩǩ
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen: mieˊlǩ
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: mieˊlǩ
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill: meâlkka
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc: mieˊlǩest
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Sg+Com: mieˊlǩin
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Ess: mieˊlǩǩen
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Par: mieˊlǩǩed
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe: mieˊlǩtää
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom: mieˊlǩ
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen: mieˊlǩi
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc: mieˊlǩid
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill: mieˊlǩid
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc: mieˊlǩin
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Pl+Com: mieˊlǩivuiˊm
     mieˊlǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe: mieˊlǩitää
